Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-824.03
Frivolous actions; applicability of sections.

Sections 25-824 to 25-824.03 shall apply unless attorney's fees are otherwise specifically provided by law, in which case the provision allowing the greater award shall prevail.

Laws 1987, LB 261, § 4.